Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
CHAPTER 1 Financial Institutions

Cross references.

Negotiable instruments, §

11-3-101

et seq.

Bank deposits and collections, §

11-4-101

et seq.

Making of loans for educational purposes, §

20-3-230

et seq.

Taxation of financial institutions, §

48-6-90

et seq.

State depositories, §

50-17-50

et seq.

Law reviews.

For note discussing and comparing the prudent man rule and the legal list rule in trustee investment, see 15 Mercer L. Rev. 530 (1964).

For note discussing transfer fees in home loan assumptions in reference to the Georgia usury laws, see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 454 (1975).

For article discussing the consolidation of laws dealing with various types of financial organizations into the Financial Institutions Code of Georgia, see 11 Ga. St. B.J. 225 (1975).

For survey article on business associations, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 71 (1990).

For annual survey article on business associations, see 45 Mercer L. Rev. 53 (1993).

For note on 1995 amendments and enactments of sections in this chapter, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1995).

For annual survey article discussing commercial and banking law, see 49 Mercer L. Rev. 95 (1997).

For survey article discussing developments in law of business associations for the period from June 1, 1998 through May 31, 1999, see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 127 (1999).

For survey article discussing developments in law of business associations for the period from June 1, 1999 through May 31, 2000, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 95 (2000).

For annual survey article discussing developments in commercial law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 143 (2000).

For survey article on cases in the areas of corporate, securities, partnership, and banking law for the period from June 1, 2002 through May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 55 (2003).